Wisconsin, session 2025, AB92.
do enact as follows:AB92,11Section 1. 15.197 (20) of the statutes is created to read:AB92,2,5215.197 (20) Spinal cord injury council. (a) There is created in the 3department of health services a spinal cord injury council that, except as provided 4in par. (b), consists of the following members appointed by the department for 2-5year terms:AB92,2,761. One member representing the University of Wisconsin School of Medicine 7and Public Health who is a researcher specializing in spinal cord injuries.AB92,2,982. One member representing Marquette University who is a researcher 9specializing in spinal cord injuries.AB92,2,11103. One member representing the Medical College of Wisconsin who is an 11expert in spinal cord injuries.AB92,2,12124. One member who has a spinal cord injury.AB92,2,13135. One member who is a family member of a person with a spinal cord injury.AB92,3,116. One member who is a veteran who has a spinal cord injury.AB92,3,327. One member who is a physician specializing in the treatment of spinal cord 3injuries.AB92,3,448. One member who is a researcher in the field of neurosurgery.AB92,3,659. One member who is a researcher employed by the veterans health 6administration of the U.S. department of veterans affairs.AB92,3,97(b) If the department of health services is unable to appoint a member 8specified in par. (a) 1. to 9., the department of health services may appoint a 9member representing the general public in lieu of the member so specified.AB92,210Section 2. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 11insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB92,317Section 3. 20.435 (1) (cd) of the statutes is created to read:AB92,3,191820.435 (1) (cd) Spinal cord injury research. Biennially, the amounts in the 19schedule for grants and symposia under s. 255.45 (2) and (3).AB92,420Section 4. 255.45 of the statutes is created to read:AB92,3,2221255.45 Spinal cord injury research grants and symposia. (1) 22Definitions. In this section:AB92,3,2323(a) “Council” means the spinal cord injury council.AB92,4,11(b) “Grant program” means the program established under sub. (2).AB92,4,92(2) Grant program. From the appropriation under s. 20.435 (1) (cd), the 3department shall award grants to persons in this state for research into spinal cord 4injuries. The purpose of the grants is to support research into new and innovative 5treatments and rehabilitative efforts for the functional improvement of individuals 6with spinal cord injuries, and research topics may include pharmaceutical, medical 7device, brain stimulus, and rehabilitative approaches and techniques. Grant 8recipients shall agree to present their research findings at symposia held by the 9department under sub. (3).AB92,4,1310(3) Symposia. If the council approves, the department shall hold a 11symposium for recipients of grants under the grant program to present findings of 12research supported by the grants. The department may not hold a symposium 13under this subsection more than once every 2 years.AB92,4,1714(4) Grant reports. By January 15 of each year, the department shall submit 15an annual report to the appropriate standing committees of the legislature under s. 1613.172 (3) that identifies the recipients of grants under the grant program and the 17purposes for which the grants were used.AB92,4,1818(5) Council. (a) The council shall do all of the following:AB92,4,20191. Develop criteria for the department to evaluate and award grants under the 20grant program.AB92,4,22212. Review and make recommendations to the department on applications 22submitted under the grant program.AB92,4,23233. Perform other duties specified by the department.AB92,5,41(b) Each member of the council shall disclose in a written statement any 2financial interest in any organization that the council recommends to receive a 3grant under the grant program. The council shall include the written statements 4with its recommendations to the department under par. (a) 2. on grant applications.AB92,5,75(6) Administrative expenses. A recipient of a grant under sub. (2) may 6annually expend no more than 8 percent of the amount received under sub. (2) for 7administrative or indirect costs and expenses.AB92,58Section 5. Nonstatutory provisions.AB92,5,129(1) Spinal cord injury council; initial appointments. Notwithstanding 10the length of terms specified for the members of the spinal cord injury council under 11s. 15.197 (20) (a) (intro.), initial appointments to the council shall be made as 12follows:AB92,5,1513(a) The members appointed under s. 15.197 (20) (a) 1., 3., 5., 7., and 9., or in 14lieu of those members under s. 15.197 (20) (b), shall be appointed for terms expiring 15on July 1, 2027.AB92,5,1816(b) The members appointed under s. 15.197 (20) (a) 2., 4., 6., and 8., or in lieu 17of those members under s. 15.197 (20) (b), shall be appointed for terms expiring on 18July 1, 2028.AB92,619Section 6. Effective date.AB92,5,2120(1) This act takes effect on the day after publication, or on the 2nd day after 21publication of the 2025 biennial budget act, whichever is later.AB92,5,2222